Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1525
Rules of federal Food and Drug Administration; compliance required.

It is a condition of licensure under the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act that a licensed hearing instrument specialist comply with the rules of the federal Food and Drug Administration governing the ordering of the use, fitting, and sales of hearing instruments as prescribed by 21 C.F.R. 801.422, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2025.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 29.